Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1400.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1102(b) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 1102. Sentence for murder, murder of unborn child and murder of law enforcement officer.* * *(b) Second degree.--Except as provided under section 1102.1, a person who has been convicted of [murder of the second degree, 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 of] second degree murder of an unborn child or of second degree murder of a law enforcement officer shall be sentenced to a term of life imprisonment.* * *Section 2. Title 18 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1102.2. Sentence for murder of the second degree.(a) Sentencing.--Except as provided under subsections (b) and (c), a defendant who has been convicted of murder of the second degree and who was 18 years of age or older at the time of the commission of the offense shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment, the minimum of which shall be fixed by the court at not less than 35 years and the maximum of which may not exceed life imprisonment.(b) Life without parole.--(1) The court may sentence a defendant who has been convicted of murder of the second degree and who was 18 years of age or older at the time of the commission of the offense to life imprisonment without parole if the finder of fact determines beyond a reasonable doubt that:(i) the defendant caused the death of the victim; and(ii) at least one of the following:(A) the victim was a law enforcement officer or a child under 13 years of age;(B) during the commission of the offense, the defendant engaged as a principal in rape or deviate sexual intercourse by force;(C) the defendant was previously convicted of a crime of violence; or(D) in addition to a victim described in 20260SB1400PN1836 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subparagraph (i), the defendant caused serious bodily injury or death to another victim DURING THE COMMISSION OF THE OFFENSE . (2) The Commonwealth shall provide reasonable notice to the defendant of its intention to seek a sentence of life imprisonment without parole under this subsection. The notice shall be provided by specifically alleging in the charging document any fact authorizing a life without parole sentence under paragraph (1).(c) Sentencing mitigation.--(1) Except when a sentence of life imprisonment without parole is authorized under subsection (b)(1) EXCEPT WHEN THE FINDER OF FACT HAS DETERMINED, UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(1)(I), THAT THE DEFENDANT CAUSED THE DEATH OF THE VICTIM AND AT LEAST ONE OF THE FACTS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (B)(1)(II)(A), (B), (C) OR (D) EXISTS , a defendant who has been convicted of murder of the second degree and who was 18 years of age or older at the time of the commission of the offense may be sentenced to a minimum term of imprisonment of less than 35 years, but not less than 10 years, and the maximum of which may not exceed 40 years, if the defendant proves AT SENTENCING by a preponderance of the evidence, and the court specifically finds, all of the following:(i) The defendant was not the only participant in the commission of the offense.(ii) The defendant did not cause, intend to cause or attempt to cause the victim's death or in any way solicit, request, conspire, command, plan or further aid another to commit the underlying felony or cause the victim's death.20260SB1400PN1836 - 3 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) The defendant did not brandish, use or threaten to use a deadly weapon in the commission of the offense.(iv) The defendant had no reason to believe that any other participant would use a deadly weapon.(v) The defendant had no reason to believe that any other participant intended to engage in conduct likely to result in death or serious bodily injury to any person.(vi) The defendant did not cause serious bodily injury to another during the commission of the offense.(2) Nothing in this subsection shall be interpreted to authorize the court to override or otherwise contradict a jury's specific finding regarding whether a fact described under subsection (b)(1) was proven beyond a reasonable doubt.(D) CULPABILITY ASSESSMENT.--IN DECIDING THE TERM OF INCARCERATION TO IMPOSE, THE COURT MAY CONSIDER ANY FACTOR BEARING ON THE DEFENDANT'S CULPABILITY AND THE NATURE AND CIRCUMSTANCES OF THE OFFENSE, INCLUDING:(1) THE IMPACT OF THE OFFENSE ON EACH VICTIM, INCLUDING ORAL AND WRITTEN VICTIM IMPACT STATEMENTS MADE OR SUBMITTED BY FAMILY MEMBERS OF THE VICTIM DETAILING THE PHYSICAL, PSYCHOLOGICAL AND ECONOMIC EFFECTS OF THE CRIME ON THE VICTIM AND THE VICTIM'S FAMILY. A VICTIM IMPACT STATEMENT MAY INCLUDE COMMENT ON THE SENTENCE OF THE DEFENDANT.(2) THE IMPACT OF THE OFFENSE ON THE COMMUNITY.(3) THE THREAT TO THE SAFETY OF THE PUBLIC OR ANY INDIVIDUAL POSED BY THE DEFENDANT.(4) THE NATURE AND CIRCUMSTANCES OF THE OFFENSE COMMITTED BY THE DEFENDANT.(5) THE DEGREE OF THE DEFENDANT'S CULPABILITY.20260SB1400PN1836 - 4 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) GUIDELINES FOR SENTENCING AND RESENTENCING ADOPTED BY THE PENNSYLVANIA COMMISSION ON SENTENCING.(7) CHARACTERISTICS OF THE DEFENDANT, INCLUDING:(I) AGE.(II) MENTAL CAPACITY.(III) MATURITY.(IV) THE DEGREE OF CRIMINAL SOPHISTICATION EXHIBITED BY THE DEFENDANT.(V) THE NATURE AND EXTENT OF ANY PRIOR DELINQUENT OR CRIMINAL HISTORY, INCLUDING THE SUCCESS OR FAILURE OF ANY PREVIOUS ATTEMPTS BY THE COURT TO REHABILITATE THE DEFENDANT.(VI) PROBATION OR INSTITUTIONAL REPORTS.(8) OTHER RELEVANT FACTORS.(d) (E) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Crime of violence." As defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 9714(g)(relating to sentences for second and subsequent offenses)."Deadly weapon." As defined in section 2301 (relating to definitions)."Principal." As defined in section 2502(d) (relating to murder)."Serious bodily injury." As defined in section 2301.Section 3. Sections 9714(g) and 9715(a) of Title 42 are amended to read:§ 9714. Sentences for second and subsequent offenses.* * *(g) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "crime of violence" means murder of the second degree or the third degree, 20260SB1400PN1836 - 5 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 voluntary manslaughter, manslaughter of a law enforcement officer as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § [2507(c) or (d)] 2507 (relating to criminal homicide of law enforcement officer), murder of the third degree involving an unborn child as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2604(c) (relating to murder of unborn child), aggravated assault of an unborn child as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2606 (relating to aggravated assault of unborn child), aggravated assault as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2702(a)(1) or (2) (relating to aggravated assault), assault of law enforcement officer as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2702.1(a)(1) (relating to assault of law enforcement officer), use of weapons of mass destruction as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2716(b) (relating to weapons of mass destruction), terrorism as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2717(b)(2) (relating to terrorism), strangulation when the offense is graded as a felony as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2718 (relating to strangulation), trafficking of persons when the offense is graded as a felony of the first degree as provided in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3011 (relating to trafficking in individuals), rape, involuntary deviate sexual intercourse, aggravated indecent assault, incest, sexual assault, arson endangering persons or aggravated arson as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3301(a) or (a.1) (relating to arson and related offenses), ecoterrorism as classified in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3311(b)(3) (relating to ecoterrorism), kidnapping, burglary as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3502(a)(1) (relating to burglary), robbery as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3701(a)(1)(i), (ii) or (iii) (relating to robbery), or robbery of a motor vehicle, drug delivery resulting in death as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2506(a) (relating to drug delivery resulting in death), or criminal attempt, criminal conspiracy or criminal solicitation to commit murder or any of the offenses 20260SB1400PN1836 - 6 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 listed above, or an equivalent crime under the laws of this Commonwealth in effect at the time of the commission of that offense or an equivalent crime in another jurisdiction.§ 9715. Life imprisonment for homicide.(a) Mandatory life imprisonment.--Notwithstanding the provisions of section 9712 (relating to sentences for offenses committed with firearms), 9713 (relating to sentences for offenses committed on public transportation) or 9714 (relating to sentences for second and subsequent offenses), any person convicted of murder of the second degree or murder of the third degree in this Commonwealth who has previously been convicted at any time of murder or voluntary manslaughter in this Commonwealth or of the same or substantially equivalent crime in any other jurisdiction shall be sentenced to life imprisonment, notwithstanding any other provision of this title or other statute to the contrary.* * *Section 4. The definition of "eligible inmate" in section 3903 of Title 61 is amended to read:§ 3903. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Eligible inmate." A person sentenced to a term of confinement under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections who is serving a term of confinement, the minimum of which is not more than two years and the maximum of which is five years or less, or an inmate who is serving a term of confinement, the minimum of which is not more than three years 20260SB1400PN1836 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 where that inmate is within two years of completing his minimum term, and who has not reached 40 years of age at the time he is approved for participation in the motivational boot camp program. The term shall not include any inmate who is subject to a sentence the calculation of which included an enhancement for the use of a deadly weapon as defined pursuant to the sentencing guidelines promulgated by the Pennsylvania Commission on Sentencing, any inmate who has been convicted or adjudicated delinquent of any crime listed under 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 97 Subch. H (relating to registration of sexual offenders) or I (relating to continued registration of sexual offenders) or any inmate with a current conviction or a prior conviction within the past ten years for 18 Pa.C.S. § 2502 (relating to murder), drug trafficking as defined in section 4103 (relating to definitions) or a crime of violence as defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 9714(g) (relating to sentences for second or subsequent offenses) or who has ever been convicted of murder of the second degree or criminal attempt, criminal solicitation or criminal conspiracy to commit any of these offenses.* * *Section 5. Title 61 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 6137.3. Parole eligibility for offenders sentenced to life for murder of the second degree.(a) Parole.--(1) Notwithstanding section 6137(a) (relating to parole power), the board shall have the power to parole an offender who is serving a sentence of life imprisonment for a conviction of murder of the second degree that was imposed prior to the effective date of this paragraph and who is not otherwise precluded from parole eligibility under subsection 20260SB1400PN1836 - 8 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b), if:(i) the offender has served at least 35 years incarceration of the life sentence; or(ii) the offender is 70 years of age or older and has served at least 20 years incarceration of the life sentence.(2) Notwithstanding section 6137(a), the board shall have the power to parole an offender sentenced under 18 Pa.C.S. § 1102.2(a) or (c) (relating to sentence for murder of the second degree). The power to parole granted to the board under this paragraph may not be exercised in the board's discretion at any time before, but only after, the expiration of the minimum term of imprisonment fixed by the court in the court's sentence or by the Board of Pardons in a sentence which has been reduced by commutation.(A) PAROLE.--NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 6137(A) (RELATING TO PAROLE POWER), THE BOARD SHALL HAVE THE POWER TO PAROLE AN OFFENDER WHO IS SERVING A SENTENCE OF LIFE IMPRISONMENT FOR A CONVICTION OF MURDER OF THE SECOND DEGREE THAT WAS IMPOSED PRIOR TO THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION IF:(1) THE OFFENDER HAS SERVED AT LEAST 35 YEARS INCARCERATION OF THE LIFE SENTENCE; OR(2) THE OFFENDER IS 70 YEARS OF AGE OR OLDER AND HAS SERVED AT LEAST 20 YEARS INCARCERATION OF THE LIFE SENTENCE.(b) Exclusions.--Subsection (a)(1) shall not apply to an offender convicted of murder of the second degree who:(1) was sentenced to life imprisonment without parole under 18 Pa.C.S. § 1102.1(b) (relating to sentence of persons under the age of 18 for murder, murder of an unborn child and murder of a law enforcement officer);20260SB1400PN1836 - 9 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) was under 18 years of age at the time of the commission of the offense and was resentenced to life imprisonment without parole after June 24, 2012;(3) is the subject of an outstanding warrant, detainer or equivalent writ of another jurisdiction, including a term of incarceration that was imposed for a separate offense;(4) (3) killed, intended to kill or attempted to kill a law enforcement officer during the commission of the offense; or(5) (4) participated in the perpetration of rape or deviate sexual intercourse by force during the commission of the offense.(c) Board considerations.--In addition to any other requirement under this chapter, in considering whether to grant parole to an offender made eligible under subsection (a), the board shall:(1) Give primary consideration to the protection of the public and to the safety of the victim or any other person.(2) Consider the nature and circumstances of the offense, including:(i) The degree of the offender's culpability in the victim's death and the perpetration of the underlying felony.(ii) Whether the offender caused, intended to cause or attempted to cause the victim's death.(iii) Any other circumstance the board deems relevant in deciding whether to grant or deny parole.(d) Additional requirements.--(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a majority of the board shall be required to make decisions 20260SB1400PN1836 - 10 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 regarding parole under this section. Only board members shall vote on whether to grant parole under this section. Prior to voting, each board member shall review any victim statement and testimony provided under section 6140 (relating to victim statements, testimony and participation in hearing).(2) The board may not consider parole in any case where the board or the Office of Victim Advocate fails to comply with the procedures specified in this section or section 6140.(e) Limitations.--(1) The provisions of this section shall not affect the sentence or parole eligibility for any term of imprisonment imposed for a separate offense.(2) Nothing under this section shall be interpreted as granting a right to be paroled to any offender.(3) A decision by the board relating to an offender who is eligible for parole under subsection (a) or sentenced under 18 Pa.C.S. § 1102.1 may not be considered an adjudication under 2 Pa.C.S. Chs. 5 Subch. A (relating to practice and procedure of Commonwealth agencies) and 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of Commonwealth agency action).Section 6. Section 6139(a)(3.1) and (3.2) of Title 61 are amended to read:§ 6139. Parole procedure.(a) Specific requirements.--* * *(3.1) Notwithstanding paragraphs (2) and (3), the board shall not be required to consider nor to dispose of an application by an offender or an offender's attorney in the 20260SB1400PN1836 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 case of an offender who is eligible for parole under section 6137.3(a) or sentenced under 18 Pa.C.S. § 1102.1 (relating to sentence of persons under the age of 18 for murder, murder of an unborn child and murder of a law enforcement officer) or 18 Pa.C.S. § 1102.2 (relating to sentence for murder of the second degree) if a parole decision has been issued by the board within five years of the date of the current application.(3.2) Nothing under this section shall be interpreted as granting a right to be paroled to any offender, and a decision by the board and its designees relating to an offender who is eligible for parole under section 6137.3(a) or sentenced under 18 Pa.C.S. § 1102.1 may not be considered an adjudication under 2 Pa.C.S. Chs. 5 Subch. A (relating to practice and procedure of Commonwealth agencies) and 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of Commonwealth agency action).* * *Section 7. Section 6140 of Title 61 is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 6140. Victim statements, testimony and participation in hearing.* * *(j) Victim notification for cases under section 6137.3(a).--This subsection shall apply only to hearings regarding the parole of an offender under section 6137.3(a)(1) (relating to parole eligibility for offenders sentenced to life for murder of the second degree). The following apply:(1) The board shall ensure that victims and family members have a reasonable opportunity to be heard at any 20260SB1400PN1836 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 hearing authorized by this section. The board shall give meaningful consideration to any testimony presented at the hearing.(2) The board shall provide notice through the Office of Victim Advocate SHALL PROVIDE NOTICE to any victim or next of kin, including to victims who are registered with the Department of Corrections, the Office of Victim Advocate and the Pennsylvania Parole Board and those whose whereabouts are otherwise known.(3) The board, through the Office of Victim Advocate , shall make all reasonable efforts to effectuate notice within 30 days of the date that a hearing is granted and at least 60 days prior to the hearing.(4) The board and Office of Victim Advocate shall make every reasonable effort to identify, find and notify victims who have not registered with the Office of Victim Advocate.(5) The board and the Office of Victim Advocate shall provide each board member with written notice containing one of the following:(i) the date and manner by which notice required under this section was effectuated; or(ii) a detained description of all efforts and methods employed to identify, locate and notify the victim or next of kin.(6) To effectuate the requirements of this subsection, the board shall issue guidelines within 30 90 days of the effective date of this paragraph.Section 8. It is the intent of this act to remedy the Pennsylvania Supreme Court's decision in Commonwealth v. Lee, 2026 WL 855614 (Pa. March 26, 2026).20260SB1400PN1836 - 13 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 9. The addition of 18 Pa.C.S. § 1102.2 shall apply to:(1) Offenses committed on or after the effective date of this paragraph.(2) Offenses committed prior to the effective date of this paragraph for which judgment of sentence has not yet been imposed.Section 10. This act shall take effect immediately.20260SB1400PN1836 - 14 - 12345678